Utah statutes.
31A-23a-118.   Car rental related licensing requirements.

(1)  Subject to Section 31A-23a-103, a person is required to hold a limited line producer license with a car rental related insurance limited line of authority to sell or offer car rental related insurance coverage under a car rental related insurance policy.

(2)  A car rental related insurance limited line license issued pursuant to Sections 31A-23a-103 and 31A-23a-106 authorizes an employee or authorized representative of the licensee to sell or offer coverage under a car rental related insurance policy to a customer at each location at which the licensee engages in car rental related insurance transactions.

(3)  An agency holding a car rental related insurance limited line license shall:

(a)  be appointed by an insurer underwriting a car rental related insurance policy that the agency sells or offers; and

(b)  have a designated responsible licensed individual at each location at which the agency is soliciting, selling, or offering car rental related insurance.

(4)  An agency holding a car rental related insurance limited line license may employ a nonlicensed individual employed as a counter sales representative in soliciting, selling, or offering car rental related insurance.  The nonlicensed individual shall be:

(a)  trained and supervised in the sale of car rental related insurance products; and

(b)  responsible to a licensed individual designated by the agency at each location where a car rental related insurance product is sold.



Enacted by Chapter 319, 2013 General Session

